test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-DerVerb_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Verb derivated by verbs.

Tests:
  Verb - biehttot: # deverbalVerbsBASSAT TV/IV  ravggat, asstat, bassat, gádjot, bårssjot)
    biehttot+V+TV+Inf: biehttot
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/lasste+V+Inf: biehttolasstet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Inf: biehtodasstet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/stasste+V+Inf: biehtostasstet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/lahtte+V+Inf: biehttolahttet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/stahtte+V+Inf: biehtostahttet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: biehtodahttet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/dalla+V+Inf: biehtudallat
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/stalla+V+Inf: biehtustallat
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/ladda+V+Inf: biehttuladdat
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: biehttolit
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/st+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: biehtostit
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/d+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: biehtodit
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: biehtudit
 #   biehttot+V+TV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Inf: biehtoduhttet
 #   biehttot+V+TV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: biehtudahttet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: biehtoduváv
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: biehtoduvvat
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehttogoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtudisjgoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtostisjgoahtet
 #   biehttot+V+TV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtoduhttegoahtet
 #   biehttot+V+TV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtudahttegoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtodasstegoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/stasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtostasstegoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/lasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehttolasstegoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/lahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehttolahttegoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/stahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtostahttegoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtodahttegoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/dalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtudallagoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/stalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehtustallagoahtet
    biehttot+V+TV+Der/ladda+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: biehttuladdagoahtet

  Verb - irrot: # deverbalVerbBASSAT TV/IV (ravggat, asstat, gádjot, bassat, bårssjot)
    irrot+V+IV+Inf: irrot
    irrot+V+IV+Der/lasste+V+Inf: irrolasstet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Inf: irodasstet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/stasste+V+Inf: irostasstet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/lahtte+V+Inf: irrolahttet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/stahtte+V+Inf: irostahttet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: irodahttet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/dalla+V+Inf: irudallat
    irrot+V+IV+Der/stalla+V+Inf: irustallat
    irrot+V+IV+Der/ladda+V+Inf: irruladdat
    irrot+V+IV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: irrolit
    irrot+V+IV+Der/st+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: irostit
    irrot+V+IV+Der/d+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: irodit
    irrot+V+IV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: irudit
    irrot+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Inf: []
    irrot+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: []
    irrot+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    irrot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: iroduvvat
    irrot+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irrogoahtet
    irrot+V+TV+Der/tj+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: []
    irrot+V+IV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irudisjgoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irostisjgoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: []
    irrot+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: []
    irrot+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irodasstegoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/stasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irostasstegoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/lasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irrolasstegoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/lahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irrolahttegoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/stahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irostahttegoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irodahttegoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/dalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irudallagoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/stalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irustallagoahtet
    irrot+V+IV+Der/ladda+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: irruladdagoahtet

  Verb - loahtjot: # deverbalVerbsBASSAT TV/IV (ravggat, asstat, bassat, gádjot, bårssjot)
    loahtjot+V+TV+Inf: loahtjot
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/lasste+V+Inf: loahtjolasstet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Inf: loatjodasstet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/stasste+V+Inf: loatjostasstet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/lahtte+V+Inf: loahtjolahttet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/stahtte+V+Inf: loatjostahttet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: loatjodahttet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/dalla+V+Inf: låtjudallat
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/stalla+V+Inf: låtjustallat
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/ladda+V+Inf: låhtjuladdat
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: loahtjolit
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/st+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: loatjostit
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/d+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: loatjodit
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: låtjudit
#    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Inf: loatjoduhttet
#    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: låtjudahttet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loatjoduváv
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: loatjoduvvat
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loahtjogoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: låtjudisjgoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loatjostisjgoahtet
#    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loatjoduhttegoahtet
#    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: låtjudahttegoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loatjodasstegoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/stasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loatjostasstegoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/lasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loahtjolasstegoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/lahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loahtjolahttegoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/stahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loatjostahttegoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: loatjodahttegoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/dalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: låtjudallagoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/stalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: låtjustallagoahtet
    loahtjot+V+TV+Der/ladda+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: låhtjuladdagoahtet

  Verb - asstat: # deverbalVerbsasstat TV/IV (ravggat, asstat, bassat, gádjot, bårssjot)
    asstat+V+IV+Inf: asstat
    asstat+V+IV+Der/lasste+V+Inf: asstalasstet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Inf: astadasstet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/stasste+V+Inf: astastasstet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/lahtte+V+Inf: asstalahttet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/stahtte+V+Inf: astastahttet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: astadahttet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/dalla+V+Inf: astadallat
    asstat+V+IV+Der/stalla+V+Inf: astastallat
    asstat+V+IV+Der/ladda+V+Inf: asstaladdat
    asstat+V+IV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: asstalit
    asstat+V+IV+Der/st+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: astastit
    asstat+V+IV+Der/d+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: astadit
    asstat+V+IV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: astadit
    asstat+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Inf: []
    asstat+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: []
    asstat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    asstat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: []
    asstat+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Inf: asstagoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: astadisjgoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: astastisjgoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: []
    asstat+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: []
    asstat+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: astadasstegoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/stasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: astastasstegoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/lasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: asstalasstegoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/lahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: asstalahttegoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/stahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: astastahttegoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: astadahttegoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/dalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: astadallagoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/stalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: astastallagoahtet
    asstat+V+IV+Der/ladda+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: asstaladdagoahtet

  Verb - riggat: # deverbalVerbsBASSAT TV/IV (ravggat, asstat, bassat, gádjot, bårssjot)
    riggat+V+IV+Inf: riggat
    riggat+V+IV+Der/lasste+V+Inf: riggalasstet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Inf: rikkadasstet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/stasste+V+Inf: rikkastasstet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/lahtte+V+Inf: riggalahttet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/stahtte+V+Inf: rikkastahttet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: rikkadahttet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/dalla+V+Inf: rikkadallat
    riggat+V+IV+Der/stalla+V+Inf: rikkastallat
    riggat+V+IV+Der/ladda+V+Inf: riggaladdat
    riggat+V+IV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: riggalit
    riggat+V+IV+Der/st+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: rikkastit
    riggat+V+IV+Der/d+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: rikkadit
    riggat+V+IV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: rikkadit
    riggat+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Inf: []
    riggat+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: []
    riggat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    riggat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: rikkaduvvat
    riggat+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Inf: riggagoahtet
    riggat+V+TV+Der/tj+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: []
    riggat+V+IV+Der/u/a/åd+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: rikkadisjgoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: rikkastisjgoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/duhtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: []
    riggat+V+IV+Der/Pass+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: []
    riggat+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: rikkadasstegoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/stasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: rikkastasstegoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/lasste+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: riggalasstegoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/lahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: riggalahttegoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/stahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: rikkastahttegoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/dahtte+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: rikkadahttegoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/dalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: rikkadallagoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/stalla+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: rikkastallagoahtet
    riggat+V+IV+Der/ladda+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: riggaladdagoahtet

  Verb - diehtet: # deverbalVerbsDIEHTET TV (diehtet)
    diehtet+V+TV+Inf: diehtet
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/d+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: diededit
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/dalla+V+Inf: diedádallat
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/dalla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: diedádaláv
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/dalla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: diedádalá
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/dalla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: diedádallá
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/dahtte+V+Inf: diededahttet
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/dasste+V+Inf: diededasstet
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: diehtelit
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: diehtelij
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: diehtelijma
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: diehtelijda
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/ladda+V+Inf: diehtáladdat
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/ladda+V+Imprt+Pl3: diehtáladdisa
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/ladda+V+ImprtII+Pl2: diehtáladdut
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/ladda+V+ImprtII+Pl3: diehtáladdusa
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/lahtte+V+Inf: diehtelahttet
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/lasste+V+Inf: diehtelasstet
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/lasste+V+Actio+Ess: diehtelasstemin
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/lasste+V+Sup: diehtelastátjit
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/st+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: diedestit
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/stalla+V+Inf: diedástallat
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/stahtte+V+Inf: diedestahttet
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/stasste+V+Inf: diedestasstet
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Inf: diehtegoahtet
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/d+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: diededisjgoahtet

  Verb - lievnnot: # deverbalVerbsBIEGGAT IV (bieggat, galssjot Impersonals)
    lievnnot+V+IV+Inf: lievnnot
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/l+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: lievnnolit
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/ladda+V+Inf: lievnnuladdat
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/lahtte+V+Inf: lievnnolahttet
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/lasste+V+Inf: lievnnolasstet
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/st+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: lievnostit
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/stalla+V+Inf: lievnustallat
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/stahtte+V+Inf: lievnostahttet
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/stasste+V+Inf: lievnostasstet
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Inf: lievnnogoahtet
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: lievnoduvvat
    lievnnot+V+TV+Der/tj+V+Gram/3syll+Inf: []
